Alabama, session 2026rs, HB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
13 Section 1. Section 32-5A-191, Code of Alabama 1975, is
14 amended to read as follows:
15 "§32-5A-191
16 (a) A person shall not drive or be in actual physical
17 control of any vehicle while:
18 (1) There is 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol
19 in his or her blood;
20 (2) Under the influence of alcohol;
21 (3) Under the influence of a controlled substance to a
22 degree which renders him or her incapable of safely driving;
23 (4) Under the combined influence of alcohol and a
24 controlled substance to a degree which renders him or her
25 incapable of safely driving; or
26 (5) Under the influence of any substance which impairs
27 the mental or physical faculties of such person to a degree
28 which that renders him or her incapable of safely driving.
Page 1

which that renders him or her incapable of safely driving.
HB1 Engrossed
29 (b)(1) A person who is under the age of 21 years of age
30 shall not drive or be in actual physical control of any
31 vehicle if there is 0.02 percent or more by weight of alcohol
32 in his or her blood.
33 (2) The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency shall
34 suspend or revoke the driver's driver license of any person,
35 including, but not limited to, a juvenile, child, or youthful
36 offender, convicted or adjudicated of, or subjected to a
37 finding of, delinquency based on this subsection.
38 (3) Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon the first
39 violation of this subsection by a person whose blood alcohol
40 level is between 0.02 and 0.08, the person's driver's driver
41 license or driving privilege shall be suspended for a period
42 of 30 days in lieu of any penalties provided in subsection (e)
43 of this section, and there shall be no disclosure, other than
44 to courts, law enforcement agencies, the person's attorney of
45 record, and the person's employer, by any entity or person of
46 any information, documents, or records relating to the
47 person's arrest, conviction, or adjudication of or finding of
48 delinquency based on this subsection.
49 (4) All persons, except as otherwise provided in this
50 subsection for a first offense, including, but not limited to,
51 a juvenile, child, or youthful offender, convicted or
52 adjudicated of or subjected to a finding of delinquency based
53 on this subsection shall be fined pursuant to this section,
54 notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, and the person
55 shall also be required to attend and complete a DUI or
56 substance abuse court referral program in accordance with
Page 2

substance abuse court referral program in accordance with
HB1 Engrossed
57 subsection (k).
58 (c)(1) A school bus or day care driver shall not drive
59 or be in actual physical control of any vehicle while in
60 performance of his or her duties if there is greater than 0.02
61 percent by weight of alcohol in his or her blood. A person
62 convicted pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the
63 penalties provided by this section, except that on the first
64 conviction the Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
65 Agency shall suspend the driving privilege or driver's driver
66 license for a period of one year.
67 (2) A person shall not drive or be in actual physical
68 control of a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in 49 CFR
69 C.F.R. Part § 383.5 of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety
70 Regulations as adopted pursuant to Section 32-9A-2, if there
71 is 0.04 percent or greater by weight of alcohol in his or her
72 blood. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section,
73 the commercial driver's driver license or commercial driving
74 privilege of a person convicted of violating this subdivision
75 shall be disqualified for the period provided in accordance
76 with 49 CFR Part C.F.R. § 383.51, as applicable, and the
77 person's regular driver's driver license or privilege to drive
78 a regular motor vehicle shall be governed by the remainder of
79 this section if the person is guilty of a violation of another
80 provision of this section.
81 (3) Any commutation of suspension or revocation time as
82 it relates to a court order, approval, and installation of an
83 ignition interlock device shall not apply to commercial
84 driving privileges or disqualifications.
Page 3

driving privileges or disqualifications.
HB1 Engrossed
85 (d) The fact that any person charged with violating
86 this section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol or
87 a controlled substance shall not constitute a defense against
88 any charge of violating this section.
89 (e)(1)a. Upon first conviction, a person violating this
90 section shall be punished by imprisonment in the county or
91 municipal jail for not more than one year, or by fine of not
92 less than six hundred dollars ($600) nor more than two
93 thousand one hundred dollars ($2,100), or by both a fine and
94 imprisonment.
95 b. In addition, on a first conviction, the Secretary of
96 the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency shall suspend the
97 driving privilege or driver's driver license of the person
98 convicted for a period of 90 days., and, following the
99 suspension, the driver shall present proof of installation of
100 an approved ignition interlock device in the designated motor
101 vehicle driven by the offender and obtain an ignition
102 interlock restricted driver license. An offender may only
103 apply to have his or her regular driver license restored after
104 possessing a restricted driver license for 180 days. The
105 90-day suspension shall be stayed if the offender elects and
106 the person shall be required to haveduring any period when the
107 offender has an approved ignition interlock device installed
108 and operating on the designated motor vehicle driven by the
109 offender for 90 days.
110 c. The offender shall present proof of installation of
111 the approved ignition interlock device to the Alabama State
112 Law Enforcement Agency and in order to obtain an ignition
Page 4

Law Enforcement Agency and in order to obtain an ignition
HB1 Engrossed
113 interlock restricted driver license. An offender may only
114 apply to have his or her regular driver license restored after
115 possessing a restricted driver license for at least 180 days.
116 The remainder of the suspension shall be commuted upon the
117 successful completion of the elected use, mandated use, or
118 both, of the ignition interlock device.
119 (2)a. If, on a first conviction, any person refusing to
120 provide a blood alcohol concentration or if a child under the
121 age of 14 years of age was a passenger in the vehicle at the
122 time of the offense or if someone else besides the offender
123 was injured at the time of the offense, or if the offender is
124 found to have had at least 0.15 percent or more by weight of
125 alcohol in his or her blood while operating or being in actual
126 control of a vehicle, the Secretary of the Alabama State Law
127 Enforcement Agency shall suspend the driving privilege or
128 driver's driver license of the person convicted for a period
129 of 90 days and the person shall be required to have an
130 ignition interlock device installed and operating on the
131 designated motor vehicle driven by the offender for a period
132 of one year from the date of issuance of a driver's driver
133 license indicating that the person's driving privileges are
134 subject to the condition of the installation and use of a
135 certified ignition interlock device on a motor vehicle.
136 b. After a minimum of 45 days of the license revocation
137 or suspension pursuant to Section 32-5A-304 or this section,
138 or both, is completed, upon receipt of a court order from the
139 convicting court, upon issuance of an ignition interlock
140 restricted driver license, and upon proof of installation of
Page 5

restricted driver license, and upon proof of installation of
HB1 Engrossed
141 an operational approved ignition interlock device on the
142 designated vehicle of the person convicted, the mandated
143 ignition interlock period of one year provided in this
144 subsection shall start and the suspension period, revocation
145 period, or both, as required under this subsection shall be
146 stayed.
147 c. The remainder of the driver license revocation
148 period, suspension period, or both, shall be commuted upon the
149 successful completion of the period of time in which the
150 ignition interlock device is mandated to be installed and
151 operational.
152 (f)(1) On a second conviction, a person convicted of
153 violating this section shall be punished by a fine of not less
154 than one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) nor more than
155 five thousand one hundred dollars ($5,100) and by
156 imprisonment, which may include hard labor in the county or
157 municipal jail for not more than one year.
158 (2) The sentence shall include a mandatory sentence,
159 which is not subject to suspension or probation, of
160 imprisonment in the county or municipal jail for not less than
161 five days or community service for not less than 30 days.
162 (3) In addition, the Secretary of the Alabama State Law
163 Enforcement Agency shall revoke the driving privileges or
164 driver's driver license of the person convicted for a period
165 of one year, and the offender shall be required to have an
166 ignition interlock device installed and operating on the
167 designated motor vehicle driven by the offender for a period
168 of two years from the date of issuance of a driver's driver
Page 6

of two years from the date of issuance of a driver's driver
HB1 Engrossed
169 license indicating that the person's driving privileges are
170 subject to the condition of the installation and use of a
171 certified ignition interlock device on a motor vehicle.
172 (4) After a minimum of 45 days of the license
173 revocation or suspension pursuant to Section 32-5A-304, this
174 section, or both, is completed, upon receipt of a court order
175 from the convicting court, upon issuance of an ignition
176 interlock restricted driver license, and upon proof of
177 installation of an operational approved ignition interlock
178 device on the designated vehicle of the person convicted, the
179 mandated ignition interlock period of two years approved in
180 this subsection shall start and the suspension period,
181 revocation period, or both, as required under this subsection
182 shall be stayed.
183 (5) The remainder of the driver license revocation
184 period, suspension period, or both, shall be commuted upon the
185 successful completion of the period of time in which the
186 ignition interlock device is mandated to be installed and
187 operational.
188 (g)(1) On a third conviction, a person convicted of
189 violating this section shall be punished by a fine of not less
190 than two thousand one hundred dollars ($2,100) nor more than
191 ten thousand one hundred dollars ($10,100) and by
192 imprisonment, which may include hard labor, in the county or
193 municipal jail for not less than 60 days nor more than one
194 year, to include a minimum of 60 days which shall be served in
195 the county or municipal jail and cannot be probated or
196 suspended.
Page 7

suspended.
HB1 Engrossed
197 (2) In addition, the Secretary of the Alabama State Law
198 Enforcement Agency shall revoke the driving privilege or
199 driver's driver license of the person convicted for a period
200 of three years and the offender shall be required to have an
201 ignition interlock device installed and operating on the
202 designated motor vehicle driven by the offender for a period
203 of three years from the date of issuance of a driver's driver
204 license indicating that the person's driving privileges are
205 subject to the condition of the installation and use of a
206 certified ignition interlock device on a motor vehicle.
207 (3) After a minimum of 60 days of the license
208 revocation or suspension pursuant to Section 32-5A-304, this
209 section, or both, is completed, upon receipt of a court order
210 from the convicting court, upon issuance of an ignition
211 interlock restricted driver license, and upon proof of
212 installation of an operational approved ignition interlock
213 device on the designated vehicle of the person convicted, the
214 mandated ignition interlock period of three years provided in
215 this subsection shall start and the suspension period,
216 revocation period, or both, as required under this subsection
217 shall be stayed.
218 (4) The remainder of the driver license revocation
219 period, suspension period, or both, shall be commuted upon the
220 successful completion of the period of time in which the
221 ignition interlock device is mandated to be installed and
222 operational.
223 (h)(1) On a fourth or subsequent conviction, or if the
224 person has a previous felony DUI conviction, a person
Page 8

person has a previous felony DUI conviction, a person
HB1 Engrossed
225 convicted of violating this section shall be guilty of a Class
226 C felony and punished by a fine of not less than four thousand
227 one hundred dollars ($4,100) nor more than ten thousand one
228 hundred dollars ($10,100) and by imprisonment of not less than
229 one year and one day nor more than 10 years.
230 (2) Any term of imprisonment may include hard labor for
231 the county or state, and where imprisonment does not exceed
232 three years, confinement may be in the county jail.
233 (3) Where imprisonment does not exceed one year and one
234 day, confinement shall be in the county jail.
235 (4) The minimum sentence shall include a term of
236 imprisonment for at least one year and one day; provided,
237 however, that there shall be a minimum mandatory sentence of
238 10 days which shall be served in the county jail.
239 (5) The remainder of the sentence may be suspended or
240 probated, but only if, as a condition of probation, the
241 defendant enrolls and successfully completes a state certified
242 chemical dependency program recommended by the court referral
243 officer and approved by the sentencing court.
244 (6) Where probation is granted, the sentencing court
245 may, in its discretion, and where monitoring equipment is
246 available, place the defendant on house arrest under
247 electronic surveillance during the probationary term.
248 (7) In addition to the other penalties authorized, the
249 Secretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency shall
250 revoke the driving privilege or driver's driver license of the
251 person convicted for a period of five years and the offender
252 shall be required to have an ignition interlock device
Page 9

shall be required to have an ignition interlock device
HB1 Engrossed
253 installed and operating on the designated motor vehicle driven
254 by the offender for a period of four years from the date of
255 issuance of a driver's driver license indicating that the
256 person's driving privileges are subject to the condition of
257 the installation and use of a certified ignition interlock
258 device on a motor vehicle.
259 (8) After a minimum of one year of the license
260 revocation or suspension pursuant to Section 32-5A-304, this
261 section, or both, is completed, upon receipt of a court order
262 from the convicting court, upon issuance of an ignition
263 interlock restricted driver license, and upon proof of
264 installation of an operational approved ignition interlock
265 device on the designated vehicle of the person convicted, the
266 mandated ignition interlock period of four years provided in
267 this subsection shall start and the suspension period,
268 revocation period, or both, as required under this subsection
269 shall be stayed.
270 (9) The remainder of the driver license revocation
271 period, suspension period, or both, shall be commuted upon the
272 successful completion of the period of time in which the
273 ignition interlock device is mandated to be installed and
274 operational.
275 (10)a. The Alabama habitual felony offender law shall
276 not apply to a conviction of a felony pursuant to this
277 subsection, and a conviction of a felony pursuant to this
278 subsection shall not be a felony conviction for purposes of
279 the enhancement of punishment pursuant to Alabama's habitual
280 felony offender law.
Page 10

felony offender law.
HB1 Engrossed
281 b. However, prior misdemeanor or felony convictions for
282 driving under the influence may be considered as part of the
283 sentencing calculations or determinations under the Alabama
284 Sentencing Guidelines or rules promulgated adopted by the
285 Alabama Sentencing Commission.
286 (i)(1) When any person convicted of violating this
287 section is found to have had at least 0.15 percent or more by
288 weight of alcohol in his or her blood while operating or being
289 in actual physical control of a vehicle, he or she shall be
290 sentenced to at least double the minimum punishment that the
291 person would have received if he or she had had less than 0.15
292 percent by weight of alcohol in his or her blood.
293 (2) This subsection does not apply to the duration of
294 time an ignition interlock device is required by this section.
295 (3) If the adjudicated offense is a misdemeanor, the
296 minimum punishment shall be imprisonment for one year, all of
297 which may be suspended except as otherwise provided for in
298 subsections (f) and (g).
299 (j)(1) When any person over the age of 21 years of age
300 is convicted of violating this section and it is found that a
301 child under the age of 14 years of age was a passenger in the
302 vehicle at the time of the offense, the person shall be
303 sentenced to at least double the minimum punishment that the
304 person would have received if the child had not been a
305 passenger in the motor vehicle.
306 (2) This subsection does not apply to the duration of
307 time an ignition interlock device is required by this section.
308 (k)(1)a. In addition to the penalties provided hereinin
Page 11

(k)(1)a. In addition to the penalties provided hereinin
HB1 Engrossed
309 this section, any person convicted of violating this section
310 shall be referred to the court referral officer for evaluation
311 and referral to appropriate community resources.
312 b. The defendant shall, at a minimum, be required to
313 complete a DUI or substance abuse court referral program
314 approved by the Administrative Office of Courts and operated
315 in accordance with provisions of the Mandatory Treatment Act
316 of 1990, Sections 12-23-1 to 12-23-19, inclusiveChapter 23 of
317 Title 12.
318 c. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency shall not
319 reissue a driver's driver license to a person convicted under
320 this section without receiving proof that the defendant has
321 successfully completed the required program.
322 (2)a. Upon conviction, the court shall notify the
323 Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency if the person convicted
324 is required to install and maintain an approved ignition
325 interlock device.
326 b. The agency shall suspend or revoke a person's
327 driving privileges until completion of the mandatory
328 suspension or revocation period required by this section, and
329 clearance of all other suspensions, revocations,
330 cancellations, or denials, and proof of installation of an
331 approved ignition interlock device is presented to the agency.
332 c. The agency shall not reissue a driver's driver
333 license to a person who has been ordered by a court or is
334 required by law to have the ignition interlock device
335 installed until proof is presented that the person is eligible
336 for reinstatement of driving privileges.
Page 12

for reinstatement of driving privileges.
HB1 Engrossed
337 d. Upon presentation of proof and compliance with all
338 ignition interlock requirements, the agency shall issue a
339 driver's driver license with a restriction indicating that the
340 licensee may operate a motor vehicle only with the certified
341 ignition interlock device installed and properly operating.
342 e. If the licensee fails to maintain the approved
343 ignition interlock device as required or is otherwise not in
344 compliance with any order of the court, the court shall notify
345 the agency of the noncompliance and the agency shall suspend
346 the person's driving privileges until the agency receives
347 notification from the court that the licensee is in
348 compliance.
349 f. The requirement that the licensee use the ignition
350 interlock device may be removed only when the court of
351 conviction confirms to the agency that the licensee is no
352 longer subject to the ignition interlock device requirement.
353 (l) Neither reckless driving nor any other traffic
354 infraction is a lesser included offense under a charge of
355 driving under the influence of alcohol or of a controlled
356 substance.
357 (m)(1) Except for fines collected for violations of
358 this section charged pursuant to a municipal ordinance, fines
359 collected for violations of this section shall be deposited to
360 the State General Fund; however, beginning October 1, 1995, of
361 any amount collected over two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for
362 a first conviction, over five hundred dollars ($500) for a
363 second conviction within 10 years, over one thousand dollars
364 ($1,000) for a third conviction within 10 years, and over two
Page 13

($1,000) for a third conviction within 10 years, and over two
HB1 Engrossed
365 thousand dollars ($2,000) for a fourth or subsequent
366 conviction within 10 years, the first one hundred dollars
367 ($100) of that additional amount shall be deposited to the
368 Alabama Chemical Testing Training and Equipment Trust Fund,
369 after three percent of the one hundred dollars ($100) is
370 deducted for administrative costs, and beginning October 1,
371 1997, and thereafter, the second one hundred dollars ($100) of
372 that additional amount shall be deposited in the Alabama Head
373 and Spinal Cord Injury Trust Fund after deducting five percent
374 of the one hundred dollars ($100) for administrative costs and
375 the remainder of the funds shall be deposited to the State
376 General Fund.
377 (2)a. Fines collected for violations of this section
378 charged pursuant to a municipal ordinance where the total fine
379 is paid at one time shall be deposited as follows: The first
380 three hundred fifty dollars ($350) collected for a first
381 conviction, the first six hundred dollars ($600) collected for
382 a second conviction within 10 years, the first one thousand
383 one hundred dollars ($1,100) collected for a third conviction,
384 and the first two thousand one hundred dollars ($2,100)
385 collected for a fourth or subsequent conviction shall be
386 deposited to the State Treasury with the first one hundred
387 dollars ($100) collected for each conviction credited to the
388 Alabama Chemical Testing Training and Equipment Trust Fund and
389 the second one hundred dollars ($100) to the Alabama Head and
390 Spinal Cord Injury Trust Fund after deducting five percent of
391 the one hundred dollars ($100) for administrative costs and
392 depositing this amount in the general fund of the
Page 14

depositing this amount in the general fund of the
HB1 Engrossed
393 municipality, and the balance credited to the State General
394 Fund.
395 b. Any amounts collected over these amounts shall be
396 deposited as otherwise provided by law.
397 (3)a. Fines collected for violations of this section
398 charged pursuant to a municipal ordinance, where the fine is
399 paid on a partial or installment basis, shall be deposited as
400 follows: The first two hundred dollars ($200) of the fine
401 collected for any conviction shall be deposited to the State
402 Treasury with the first one hundred dollars ($100) collected
403 for any conviction credited to the Alabama Chemical Testing
404 Training and Equipment Trust Fund and the second one hundred
405 dollars ($100) for any conviction credited to the Alabama Head
406 and Spinal Cord Injury Trust Fund after deducting five percent
407 of the one hundred dollars ($100) for administrative costs and
408 depositing this amount in the general fund of the
409 municipality.
410 b. The second three hundred dollars ($300) of the fine
411 collected for a first conviction, the second eight hundred
412 dollars ($800) collected for a second conviction, the second
413 one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) collected for a
414 third conviction, and the second three thousand eight hundred
415 dollars ($3,800) collected for a fourth conviction shall be
416 divided with 50 percent of the funds collected to be deposited
417 to the State Treasury to be credited to the State General Fund
418 and 50 percent deposited as otherwise provided by law for
419 municipal ordinance violations.
420 c. Any amounts collected over these amounts shall be
Page 15

c. Any amounts collected over these amounts shall be
HB1 Engrossed
421 deposited as otherwise provided by law for municipal ordinance
422 violations.
423 (4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
424 contrary, 90 percent of any fine assessed and collected for
425 any DUI offense charged by municipal ordinance violation in
426 district or circuit court shall be computed only on the amount
427 assessed over the minimum fine authorized, and upon collection
428 shall be distributed to the municipal general fund with the
429 remaining 10 percent distributed to the State General Fund.
430 (5)a. In addition to fines imposed pursuant to this
431 subsection, a mandatory fee of one hundred dollars ($100)
432 shall be collected from any individual who successfully
433 completes any pretrial diversion or deferral program in any
434 municipal, district, or circuit court where the individual was
435 charged with a violation of this section or a corresponding
436 municipal ordinance.
437 b. The one hundred dollars ($100) shall be deposited
438 into the Alabama Chemical Testing Training and Equipment Fund.
439 (6)a. In addition to the fines and fees imposed
440 pursuant to this subsection, a mandatory fee of one hundred
441 dollars ($100) shall be collected from any individual who
442 successfully completes any pretrial diversion or deferral
443 program in any municipal, district, or circuit court where the
444 individual was charged with a violation of this section or a
445 corresponding municipal ordinance.
446 b. The one hundred dollars ($100) shall be deposited
447 into the Alabama Head and Spinal Cord Injury Trust Fund.
448 (n)(1) A person who has been arrested for violating
Page 16

(n)(1) A person who has been arrested for violating
HB1 Engrossed
449 this section shall not be released from jail under bond or
450 otherwise, until there is less than the same percent by weight
451 of alcohol in his or her blood as specified in subsection
452 subdivision (a)(1) or, in the case of a person who is under
453 the age of 21 years of age, subsection (b) hereof.
454 (2)a. A judge may require an offender to install and
455 use a certified ignition interlock device as a condition of
456 bond. In that instance, the Secretary of the Alabama State Law
457 Enforcement Agency shall issue the offender a restricted
458 driver's license indicating the person's driving privileges
459 are subject to the condition of the installation and use of a
460 certified ignition interlock device on a motor vehicle.
461 b. Any driver's driver license suspension or revocation
462 period pursuant to Section 32-5A-304 shall be stayed during
463 the period the offender is under the bond condition.
464 c. The period of time the offender has the ignition
465 interlock device installed as a condition of bond shall not be
466 credited to any requirement to have an ignition interlock
467 device upon conviction.
468 (o) Upon verification that a defendant arrested
469 pursuant to this section is currently on probation from
470 another court of this state as a result of a conviction for
471 any criminal offense, the prosecutor shall provide written or
472 oral notification of the defendant's subsequent arrest and
473 pending prosecution to the court in which the prior conviction
474 occurred.
475 (p)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2), a prior
476 conviction for driving under the influence from this state, a
Page 17

conviction for driving under the influence from this state, a
HB1 Engrossed
477 municipality within this state, or another state or territory
478 or a municipality of another state or territory shall be
479 considered by a court for imposing a sentence pursuant to this
480 section if the prior conviction occurred within 10 years of
481 the date of the current offense.
482 (2) If the person has a previous felony DUI conviction,
483 then all of the person's subsequent DUI convictions shall be
484 treated as felonies regardless of the date of the previous
485 felony DUI conviction.
486 (q) Any person convicted of driving under the influence
487 of alcohol, or a controlled substance, or both, or any
488 substance which impairs the mental or physical faculties in
489 violation of this section, a municipal ordinance adopting this
490 section, or a similar law from another state or territory or a
491 municipality of another state or territory more than once in a
492 10-year period shall have his or her motor vehicle
493 registration for all vehicles owned by the repeat offender
494 suspended by the Alabama Department of Revenue for the
495 duration of the offender's driver's driver license suspension
496 period, unless such action would impose an undue hardship to
497 any individual, not including the repeat offender, who is
498 completely dependent on the motor vehicle for the necessities
499 of life, including any family member of the repeat offender
500 and any co-owner of the vehicle or, in the case of a repeat
501 offender, if the repeat offender has a functioning ignition
502 interlock device installed on the designated vehicle for the
503 duration of the offender's driver's driver license suspension
504 period.
Page 18

period.
HB1 Engrossed
505 (r)(1) Any person ordered by the court to have an
506 ignition interlock device installed on a designated vehicle,
507 and any person who elects to have the ignition interlock
508 device installed on a designated vehicle for the purpose of
509 reducing a period of suspension or revocation of his or her
510 driver's driver license, shall pay to the court, following his
511 or her conviction, two hundred dollars ($200), which may be
512 paid in installments and which shall be divided as follows:
513 a. Seventeen percent to the Alabama Interlock Indigent
514 Fund.
515 b. For cases in the district or circuit court, 30
516 percent to the State Judicial Administration Fund administered
517 by the Administrative Office of Courts and for cases in the
518 municipal court, 30 percent to the municipal judicial
519 administration fund of the municipality where the municipal
520 court is located to be used for the operation of the municipal
521 court.
522 c. Thirty percent to the Highway Traffic Safety Fund
523 administered by the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency.
524 d. Twenty-three percent to the District Attorney's
525 Solicitor Fund.
526 (2) In addition to paying the court clerk the fee
527 required above following the conviction or the voluntary
528 installation of the ignition interlock device, the defendant
529 shall pay all costs associated with the installation,
530 purchase, maintenance, or lease of the ignition interlock
531 devices to an approved ignition interlock provider pursuant to
532 the rules of the Department of Forensic Sciences, unless the
Page 19

the rules of the Department of Forensic Sciences, unless the
HB1 Engrossed
533 defendant is subject to Section 32-5A-191.4(i)(4).
534 (s) The defendant shall designate the vehicle to be
535 used by identifying the vehicle by the vehicle identification
536 number to the court. The defendant, at his or her own expense,
537 may designate additional motor vehicles on which an ignition
538 interlock device may be installed for the use of the
539 defendant.
540 (t)(1) Any person who is required to comply with the
541 ignition interlock provisions of this section as a condition
542 of restoration or reinstatement of his or her driver's driver
543 license, shall only operate the designated vehicle equipped
544 with a functioning ignition interlock device for the period of
545 time consistent with the offense for which he or she was
546 convicted as provided for in this section.
547 (2) The duration of the time an ignition interlock
548 device is required by this section shall be one year if the
549 offender refused the prescribed chemical test for
550 intoxication.
551 (u)(1)a. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency may
552 set a fee of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150)
553 for the issuance of a driver's driver license indicating that
554 the person's driving privileges are subject to the condition
555 of the installation and use of a certified ignition interlock
556 device on a motor vehicle.
557 b. Fifteen percent of the fee shall be distributed to
558 the general fund of the county where the person was convicted
559 to be utilized for law enforcement purposes.
560 c. Eighty-five percent shall be distributed to the
Page 20

c. Eighty-five percent shall be distributed to the
HB1 Engrossed
561 State General Fund.
562 d. In addition, at the end of the time the person's
563 driving privileges are subject to the above conditions, the
564 agency shall set a fee of not more than seventy-five dollars
565 ($75) to reissue a regular driver's driver license.
566 e. The fee shall be deposited as provided in Sections
567 32-6-5, 32-6-6, and 32-6-6.1.
568 (2) The defendant shall provide proof of installation
569 of an approved ignition interlock device to the Alabama State
570 Law Enforcement Agency as a condition of the issuance of a
571 restricted driver's driver license.
572 (3) Any ignition interlock driving violation committed
573 by the offender during the mandated ignition interlock period
574 shall extend the duration of ignition interlock use for six
575 months. Ignition interlock driving violations include any of
576 the following:
577 a. A breath sample at or above a minimum blood alcohol
578 concentration level of 0.02 recorded four or more times during
579 the monthly reporting period unless a subsequent test
580 performed within 10 minutes registers a breath alcohol
581 concentration lower than 0.02.
582 b. Any tampering, circumvention, or bypassing of the
583 ignition interlock device, or attempt thereof.
584 c. Failure to comply with the servicing or calibration
585 requirements of the ignition interlock device every 30 days.
586 (v) Nothing in this section and Section 32-5A-191.4
587 shall require an employer to install an ignition interlock
588 device in a vehicle owned or operated by the employer for use
Page 21

device in a vehicle owned or operated by the employer for use
HB1 Engrossed
589 by an employee required to use the device as a condition of
590 driving pursuant to this section and Section 32-5A-191.4.
591 (w) The provisions in this section and Section
592 32-5A-191.4 relating to ignition interlock devices shall not
593 apply to persons who commit violations of this section while
594 under 19 years of age and who are adjudicated in juvenile
595 court, unless specifically ordered otherwise by the court.
596 (x)(1) The amendatory language in Act 2014-222 to this
597 section, authorizing the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency
598 to stay a driver's driver license suspension or revocation
599 upon compliance with the ignition interlock requirement shall
600 apply retroactively if any of the following occurs:
601 a. The offender files an appeal with the court of
602 jurisdiction requesting all prior suspensions or revocation,
603 or both, be stayed upon compliance with the ignition interlock
604 requirement.
605 b. The offender wins appeal with the court of
606 jurisdiction relating to this section.
607 c. The court of jurisdiction notifies the Alabama State
608 Law Enforcement Agency that the offender is eligible to have
609 the driver's driver license stayed.
610 d. The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency issues an
611 ignition interlock restricted driver's driver license.
612 e. The offender remains in compliance of ignition
613 interlock requirements.
614 (2) The remainder of the driver license revocation,
615 suspension, or both, shall be commuted upon the successful
616 completion of the period of time in which the ignition
Page 22

completion of the period of time in which the ignition
HB1 Engrossed
617 interlock device is mandated to be installed and operational.
618 (y) Pursuant to Section 15-22-54, the maximum probation
619 period for persons convicted under this section shall be
620 extended until all ignition interlock requirements have been
621 completed by the offender.
622 (z) Notwithstanding the ignition interlock requirements
623 of this section, no person may be required to install an
624 ignition interlock device if there is not a certified ignition
625 interlock provider available within a 50 mile radius of his or
626 her place of residence or, place of business, or place of
627 employment."
628 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
629 1, 2026.
Page 23

1, 2026.
HB1 Engrossed
630
631
632 House of Representatives
633 Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
634 to the House of Representatives
635 committee on Public Safety and
636 Homeland Security
637
638 Read for the second time and placed ................21-Jan-26
639 on the calendar:
640 0 amendments
641
642 Read for the third time and passed ................03-Feb-26
643 as amended
644 Yeas 100
645 Nays 0
646 Abstains 4
647
648
649 John Treadwell
650 Clerk
651
Page 24